scripts/ru_lemmas/pos/n.lexd
LEXICON RuLemmasN
a-bačen<n>:ребята<n>
а-бачен<n>:ребята<n>
a-bačo<n>:ребята<n>
а-бачо<n>:ребята<n>
a-čen<n>:ребята<n>
а-чен<n>:ребята<n>
abaš<n>:чернокожий<n>
абаш<n>:чернокожий<n>
abðust<n>:рукавица<n>
абδуст<n>:рукавица<n>
abðusteǰ<n>:материал<n>
абδустеҷ<n>:материал<n>
abed<n>:обед<n>
абед<n>:обед<n>
abīb<n>:название_дикорастущего_цветка<n>
абӣб<n>:название_дикорастущего_цветка<n>
abīb<n>:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент<n>
абӣб<n>:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент<n>
abīn<n>:жена_многоженца<n>
абӣн<n>:жена_многоженца<n>
abīnêrӡ<n>:жена_многоженца<n>
абӣнêрӡ<n>:жена_многоженца<n>
abīnen<n>:жена_многоженца<n>
абӣнен<n>:жена_многоженца<n>
abīnorǰ<n>:жена_многоженца<n>
абӣнорҷ<n>:жена_многоженца<n>
abīn<n>:ненавистница<n>
абӣн<n>:ненавистница<n>
abīnêrӡ<n>:ненавистница<n>
абӣнêрӡ<n>:ненавистница<n>
abīnen<n>:ненавистница<n>
абӣнен<n>:ненавистница<n>
abīnorǰ<n>:ненавистница<n>
абӣнорҷ<n>:ненавистница<n>
abkům<n>:обком<n>
абку̊м<n>:обком<n>
apkům<n>:обком<n>
апку̊м<n>:обком<n>
obkům<n>:обком<n>
обку̊м<n>:обком<n>
abkům<n>:секретарь_обкома<n>
абку̊м<n>:секретарь_обкома<n>
apkům<n>:секретарь_обкома<n>
апку̊м<n>:секретарь_обкома<n>
obkům<n>:секретарь_обкома<n>
обку̊м<n>:секретарь_обкома<n>
abkůmpārt<n>:обком_партии<n>
абку̊мпāрт<n>:обком_партии<n>
abkůmpārtiya<n>:обком_партии<n>
абку̊мпāртийа<n>:обком_партии<n>
obkůmpārt<n>:обком_партии<n>
обку̊мпāрт<n>:обком_партии<n>
obkůmpārtiya<n>:обком_партии<n>
обку̊мпāртийа<n>:обком_партии<n>
ablagari<n>:глупость<n>
аблагари<n>:глупость<n>
ablagi<n>:глупость<n>
аблаги<n>:глупость<n>
ablakův<n>:цеп<n>
аблаку̊в<n>:цеп<n>
ablā<n>:глупец<n>
аблā<n>:глупец<n>
ablā<n>:простак<n>
аблā<n>:простак<n>
abotā<n>:глупец<n>
аботā<n>:глупец<n>
abotā<n>:глупость<n>
аботā<n>:глупость<n>
aboxi<n>:тупость<n>
абохи<n>:тупость<n>
abrayeǰ<n>:ткань_для_лицевой_стороны_одежды<n>
абрайеҷ<n>:ткань_для_лицевой_стороны_одежды<n>
abrat<n>:обман<n>
абрат<n>:обман<n>
abrat-ðāðīǰ<n>:обманщик<n>
абрат-δāδӣҷ<n>:обманщик<n>
abrā<n>:лицевая_сторона_ткани<n>
абрā<n>:лицевая_сторона_ткани<n>
abrex̌um<n>:шелк<n>
абрех̌ум<n>:шелк<n>
virex̌um<n>:шелк<n>
вирех̌ум<n>:шелк<n>
abrex̌um<n>:шелк<n>
абрех̌ум<n>:шелк<n>
virex̌um<n>:шелк<n>
вирех̌ум<n>:шелк<n>
abrê<n>:облако<n>
абрê<n>:облако<n>
abri<n>:облако<n>
абри<n>:облако<n>
habrê<n>:облако<n>
ҳабрê<n>:облако<n>
abridaxi<n>:облачность<n>
абридахи<n>:облачность<n>
abtari<n>:лень<n>
абтари<n>:лень<n>
abūbāk<n>:удод<n>
абӯбāк<n>:удод<n>
bubūbāk<n>:удод<n>
бубӯбāк<n>:удод<n>
abǰad<n>:абджад<n>
абҷад<n>:абджад<n>
avānc<n>:аванс<n>
авāнц<n>:аванс<n>
avār<n>:авария<n>
авāр<n>:авария<n>
aviāciya<n>:авиация<n>
авиāцийа<n>:авиация<n>
aviyāciya<n>:авиация<n>
авийāцийа<n>:авиация<n>
avix̌c<n>:пучок<n>
авих̌ц<n>:пучок<n>
avlīz<n>:стенки_глиняного_сосуда<n>
авлӣз<n>:стенки_глиняного_сосуда<n>
aw-aw<n>:тявканье<n>
аw-аw<n>:тявканье<n>
aw-aw<n>:слух<n>
аw-аw<n>:слух<n>
awal-vegā<n>:сумерки<n>
аwал-вегā<n>:сумерки<n>
awas<n>:желание<n>
аwас<n>:желание<n>
awwal<n>:начало<n>
аwwал<n>:начало<n>
awal<n>:начало<n>
аwал<n>:начало<n>
aweli<n>:дом<n>
аwели<n>:дом<n>
aweǰ-xux̌pā<n>:похлебка<n>
аwеҷ-хух̌пā<n>:похлебка<n>
awlāq<n>:скиталец<n>
аwлāқ<n>:скиталец<n>
awlāqi<n>:скиталец<n>
аwлāқи<n>:скиталец<n>
awlāqgari<n>:скитание<n>
аwлāқгари<n>:скитание<n>
awlāqigari<n>:скитание<n>
аwлāқигари<n>:скитание<n>
awli<n>:двор<n>
аwли<n>:двор<n>
awliyo<n>:предсказатель<n>
аwлийо<n>:предсказатель<n>
awlod<n>:потомок<n>
аwлод<n>:потомок<n>
awlod<n>:близкие<n>
аwлод<n>:близкие<n>
awlodā<n>:потомство<n>
аwлодā<n>:потомство<n>
awlod-bāx̌<n>:разделение_по_родству<n>
аwлод-бāх̌<n>:разделение_по_родству<n>
awo<n>:воздух<n>
аwо<n>:воздух<n>
awo<n>:погода<n>
аwо<n>:погода<n>
awo<n>:климат<n>
аwо<n>:климат<n>
awobalandi<n>:высокомерие<n>
аwобаланди<n>:высокомерие<n>
awo-bucak<n>:небольшой_дождь_или_снег_при_солнце<n>
аwо-буцак<n>:небольшой_дождь_или_снег_при_солнце<n>
awogi<n>:погода<n>
аwоги<n>:погода<n>
awoyi<n>:погода<n>
аwойи<n>:погода<n>
āwoz<n>:голос<n>
āwоз<n>:голос<n>
awoz<n>:голос<n>
аwоз<n>:голос<n>
owoz<n>:голос<n>
оwоз<n>:голос<n>
āwoz<n>:право_голоса<n>
āwоз<n>:право_голоса<n>
awoz<n>:право_голоса<n>
аwоз<n>:право_голоса<n>
owoz<n>:право_голоса<n>
оwоз<n>:право_голоса<n>
awoz-ðêd<n>:голосование<n>
аwоз-δêд<n>:голосование<n>
owoz-ðêd<n>:голосование<n>
оwоз-δêд<n>:голосование<n>
awolā<n>:кидание<n>
аwолā<n>:кидание<n>
awopaymo<n>:воздухоплаватель<n>
аwопаймо<n>:воздухоплаватель<n>
awopaymoyi<n>:воздухоплавание<n>
аwопаймойи<n>:воздухоплавание<n>
awoxo<n>:хвастун<n>
аwохо<n>:хвастун<n>
awoxoyi<n>:хвастовство<n>
аwохойи<n>:хвастовство<n>
awrat<n>:женщина<n>
аwрат<n>:женщина<n>
awrat<n>:жена<n>
аwрат<n>:жена<n>
awratīnā<n>:женский_пол<n>
аwратӣнā<n>:женский_пол<n>
awz<n>:бассейн<n>
аwз<n>:бассейн<n>
awӡ<n>:бассейн<n>
аwӡ<n>:бассейн<n>
awӡi<n>:глубина<n>
аwӡи<n>:глубина<n>
awɣůn<n>:афганец<n>
аwғу̊н<n>:афганец<n>
afɣůn<n>:афганец<n>
афғу̊н<n>:афганец<n>
awqot<n>:пропитание<n>
аwқот<n>:пропитание<n>
afqot<n>:пропитание<n>
афқот<n>:пропитание<n>
awqot-vor<n>:тот<n>
аwқот-вор<n>:тот<n>
awqotwori<n>:продукты_питания<n>
аwқотwори<n>:продукты_питания<n>
awǰ<n>:энтузиазм<n>
аwҷ<n>:энтузиазм<n>
aga-či<n>:побудка<n>
ага-чи<n>:побудка<n>
aga-čīd<n>:побудка<n>
ага-чӣд<n>:побудка<n>
agent<n>:агент<n>
агент<n>:агент<n>
agetpūnkt<n>:агитпункт<n>
агетпӯнкт<n>:агитпункт<n>
agitātor<n>:агитатор<n>
агитāтор<n>:агитатор<n>
agitātur<n>:агитатор<n>
агитāтур<n>:агитатор<n>
agitātori<n>:агитаторство<n>
агитāтори<n>:агитаторство<n>
agitāturi<n>:агитаторство<n>
агитāтури<n>:агитаторство<n>
agitāciya<n>:агитация<n>
агитāцийа<n>:агитация<n>
agranům<n>:агроном<n>
аграну̊м<n>:агроном<n>
agranůmi<n>:обязанности_агронома<n>
аграну̊ми<n>:обязанности_агронома<n>
adab<n>:благонравие<n>
адаб<n>:благонравие<n>
adabiyot<n>:литература<n>
адабийот<n>:литература<n>
adad<n>:число<n>
адад<n>:число<n>
adāx̌c<n>:железная_накладка_в_верхнем_жернове_водяной_мельницы<n>
адāх̌ц<n>:железная_накладка_в_верхнем_жернове_водяной_мельницы<n>
adāɣӡ<n>:железная_накладка_в_верхнем_жернове_водяной_мельницы<n>
адāғ̌ӡ<n>:железная_накладка_в_верхнем_жернове_водяной_мельницы<n>
adwo<n>:средства<n>
адwо<n>:средства<n>
idwo<n>:средства<n>
идwо<n>:средства<n>
yidwo<n>:средства<n>
йидwо<n>:средства<n>
adir<n>:луг<n>
адир<n>:луг<n>
adgāl<n>:одеяло<n>
адгāл<n>:одеяло<n>
adyāl<n>:одеяло<n>
адйāл<n>:одеяло<n>
adli<n>:справедливость<n>
адли<n>:справедливость<n>
ado<n>:выполнение<n>
адо<n>:выполнение<n>
adolat<n>:справедливость<n>
адолат<n>:справедливость<n>
adolatxo<n>:поборник_справедливости<n>
адолатхо<n>:поборник_справедливости<n>
a-ða<n>:эй<n>
а-δа<n>:эй<n>
aθêrīǰ<n>:податель<n>
аθêрӣҷ<n>:податель<n>
aθič<n>:пучок<n>
аθич<n>:пучок<n>
adič<n>:пучок<n>
адич<n>:пучок<n>
aždaor<n>:сказочное_чудовище<n>
аждаор<n>:сказочное_чудовище<n>
aždar<n>:сказочное_чудовище<n>
аждар<n>:сказочное_чудовище<n>
aždahor<n>:сказочное_чудовище<n>
аждаҳор<n>:сказочное_чудовище<n>
ažduor<n>:сказочное_чудовище<n>
аждуор<n>:сказочное_чудовище<n>
ažduhor<n>:сказочное_чудовище<n>
аждуҳор<n>:сказочное_чудовище<n>
azal<n>:начало<n>
азал<n>:начало<n>
azal<n>:имя_собств_муж_и_жен_или_его_компонент<n>
азал<n>:имя_собств_муж_и_жен_или_его_компонент<n>
azīz<n>:имя_собств_муж_и_жен_или_его_компонент<n>
азӣз<n>:имя_собств_муж_и_жен_или_его_компонент<n>
azli<n>:шутка<n>
азли<n>:шутка<n>
azligūy<n>:шутник<n>
азлигӯй<n>:шутник<n>
azo<n>:траур<n>
азо<n>:траур<n>
azob<n>:мучение<n>
азоб<n>:мучение<n>
azoyim<n>:заклинания<n>
азойим<n>:заклинания<n>
azorzā<n>:мешанка<n>
азорзā<n>:мешанка<n>
azorsalgi<n>:тысячелетие<n>
азорсалги<n>:тысячелетие<n>
azorsolagi<n>:тысячелетие<n>
азорсолаги<n>:тысячелетие<n>
azorǰīd<n>:отдел_желудка<n>
азорҷӣд<n>:отдел_желудка<n>
azrat<n>:светлость<n>
азрат<n>:светлость<n>
azrat<n>:компонент_имени_собств_муж<n>
азрат<n>:компонент_имени_собств_муж<n>
az-ro-ðāðīǰ<n>:совратитель<n>
аз-ро-δāδӣҷ<n>:совратитель<n>
az-ro-zan<n>:совратитель<n>
аз-ро-зан<n>:совратитель<n>
ayal-dawo<n>:старание<n>
айал-даwо<n>:старание<n>
ayb<n>:изъян<n>
айб<n>:изъян<n>
ayb<n>:вина<n>
айб<n>:вина<n>
aybdor<n>:виновник<n>
айбдор<n>:виновник<n>
aybdori<n>:виновность<n>
айбдори<n>:виновность<n>
aybnůmā<n>:обвинительное_заключение<n>
айбну̊мā<n>:обвинительное_заключение<n>
aybpūx̌i<n>:сокрытие_недостатков<n>
айбпӯх̌и<n>:сокрытие_недостатков<n>
aybpūši<n>:сокрытие_недостатков<n>
айбпӯши<n>:сокрытие_недостатков<n>
aywůn<n>:животное<n>
айwу̊н<n>:животное<n>
ewůn<n>:животное<n>
еwу̊н<n>:животное<n>
aywůngari<n>:скотство<n>
айwу̊нгари<n>:скотство<n>
aywůni<n>:скотство<n>
айwу̊ни<n>:скотство<n>
ewůni<n>:скотство<n>
еwу̊ни<n>:скотство<n>
aywůndor<n>:владеющий_скотом<n>
айwу̊ндор<n>:владеющий_скотом<n>
aywůndori<n>:животноводство<n>
айwу̊ндори<n>:животноводство<n>
aywůnot<n>:животные<n>
айwу̊нот<n>:животные<n>
āyd<n>:праздник<n>
āйд<n>:праздник<n>
ayd<n>:праздник<n>
айд<n>:праздник<n>
yīd<n>:праздник<n>
йӣд<n>:праздник<n>
īd<n>:праздник<n>
ӣд<n>:праздник<n>
aykal<n>:памятник<n>
айкал<n>:памятник<n>
ekal<n>:памятник<n>
екал<n>:памятник<n>
yekal<n>:памятник<n>
йекал<n>:памятник<n>
aykal<n>:амулет<n>
айкал<n>:амулет<n>
ekal<n>:амулет<n>
екал<n>:амулет<n>
yekal<n>:амулет<n>
йекал<n>:амулет<n>
ay-kinīǰ<n>:погонщик<n>
ай-кинӣҷ<n>:погонщик<n>
ay-kunīǰ<n>:погонщик<n>
ай-кунӣҷ<n>:погонщик<n>
aymůn<n>:вера<n>
айму̊н<n>:вера<n>
aymun<n>:вера<n>
аймун<n>:вера<n>
emůn<n>:вера<n>
ему̊н<n>:вера<n>
yemůn<n>:вера<n>
йему̊н<n>:вера<n>
yemun<n>:вера<n>
йемун<n>:вера<n>
ayni<n>:самое_время<n>
айни<n>:самое_время<n>
ayo<n>:стыд<n>
айо<n>:стыд<n>
ayyor<n>:имя_собств_или_его_компонент<n>
аййор<n>:имя_собств_или_его_компонент<n>
ayor<n>:имя_собств_или_его_компонент<n>
айор<n>:имя_собств_или_его_компонент<n>
ayori<n>:хитрость<n>
айори<n>:хитрость<n>
ayos<n>:мороз<n>
айос<n>:мороз<n>
ayot<n>:жизнь<n>
айот<n>:жизнь<n>
ayot<n>:память<n>
айот<n>:память<n>
ayoti<n>:память<n>
айоти<n>:память<n>
ayrapilān<n>:аэроплан<n>
айрапилāн<n>:аэроплан<n>
alapilān<n>:аэроплан<n>
алапилāн<n>:аэроплан<n>
ayraport<n>:аэропорт<n>
айрапорт<n>:аэропорт<n>
ayrat<n>:удивление<n>
айрат<n>:удивление<n>
ayrůngi<n>:удивление<n>
айру̊нги<n>:удивление<n>
ayrůni<n>:удивление<n>
айру̊ни<n>:удивление<n>
erůngi<n>:удивление<n>
еру̊нги<n>:удивление<n>
yerůngi<n>:удивление<n>
йеру̊нги<n>:удивление<n>
ayům<n>:праздник<n>
айу̊м<n>:праздник<n>
ayům<n>:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент<n>
айу̊м<n>:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент<n>
ayůmeǰ<n>:продукты<n>
айу̊меҷ<n>:продукты<n>
ayůɣi<n>:верхняя_часть_позвоночника<n>
айу̊ғи<n>:верхняя_часть_позвоночника<n>
ayš<n>:наслаждение<n>
айш<n>:наслаждение<n>
akadem<n>:академия<n>
академ<n>:академия<n>
akademi<n>:академия<n>
академи<n>:академия<n>
akadem<n>:академик<n>
академ<n>:академик<n>
akademi<n>:академик<n>
академи<n>:академик<n>
akademiyā<n>:академия<n>
академийā<n>:академия<n>
akademik<n>:академик<n>
академик<n>:академик<n>
akak<n>:дрожь<n>
акак<n>:дрожь<n>
akā<n>:брат<n>
акā<n>:брат<n>
akā<n>:эй<n>
акā<n>:эй<n>
akbar<n>:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент<n>
акбар<n>:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент<n>
akīm<n>:врач<n>
акӣм<n>:врач<n>
akīm<n>:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент<n>
акӣм<n>:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент<n>
āks<n>:отражение<n>
āкс<n>:отражение<n>
ākc<n>:отражение<n>
āкц<n>:отражение<n>
aks<n>:отражение<n>
акс<n>:отражение<n>
akc<n>:отражение<n>
акц<n>:отражение<n>
āks<n>:испуг<n>
āкс<n>:испуг<n>
ākc<n>:испуг<n>
āкц<n>:испуг<n>
aks<n>:испуг<n>
акс<n>:испуг<n>
akc<n>:испуг<n>
акц<n>:испуг<n>
aksariyat<n>:большинство<n>
аксарийат<n>:большинство<n>
aktīv<n>:актив<n>
актӣв<n>:актив<n>
aktīv<n>:активист<n>
актӣв<n>:активист<n>
akūmat<n>:правительство<n>
акӯмат<n>:правительство<n>
ukūmat<n>:правительство<n>
укӯмат<n>:правительство<n>
alabi<n>:чашка<n>
алаби<n>:чашка<n>
alalaš<n>:смесь<n>
алалаш<n>:смесь<n>
alaraš<n>:смесь<n>
алараш<n>:смесь<n>
aralaš<n>:смесь<n>
аралаш<n>:смесь<n>
araraš<n>:смесь<n>
арараш<n>:смесь<n>
alalot<n>:громкий_шум<n>
алалот<n>:громкий_шум<n>
alalot<n>:плач<n>
алалот<n>:плач<n>
alam<n>:обида<n>
алам<n>:обида<n>
alam<n>:огорчение<n>
алам<n>:огорчение<n>
alamůn<n>:вор<n>
аламу̊н<n>:вор<n>
alamūn<n>:вор<n>
аламӯн<n>:вор<n>
alaf<n>:трава<n>
алаф<n>:трава<n>
